District of Columbia statutes.
1-182

Establishment of Emancipation Day Parade.

There is established the Emancipation Day Parade, to annually celebrate and commemorate District of Columbia Emancipation Day. For Fiscal Year 2015 only, the Council committee with oversight related to the District of Columbia Emancipation Day shall continue to coordinate the District of Columbia Emancipation Day activities in consultation with the Office of the Mayor.

Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-240, § 3, 51 DCR 11225
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 1102(a), 61 DCR 9990
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added the last sentence.
For temporary (225 day) additions, see §§ 3, 5 of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Fund Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-125, May 2, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 4400).
For temporary (225 day) additions, see §§ 3, 5 of Emancipation Day Fund Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-9, June 5, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 4873).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3 of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Parade and Fund Temporary Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-138, April 22, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 4922).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see §§ 3, 5 of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Fund Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-263, January 30, 2002, 49 DCR 1443).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see §§ 3, 5 of Emancipation Day Fund Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-17, February 25, 2003, 50 DCR 1948).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see §§ 3, 5 of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Parade and Fund Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-343, January 29, 2004, 51 DCR 1827).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see §§ 3, 5 of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Parade and Fund Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-660, December 29, 2004, 52 DCR 797).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1102(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1102(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1102(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).